District of Columbia statutes.
29-403.03

Emergency powers.

(a)

If a nonprofit corporation authorizes the exercise of emergency powers in its articles of incorporation or bylaws, in the event of an emergency, the board of directors may:

(1)

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent; and

(2)

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(b)

During an emergency, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise:

(1)

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner; and

(2)

One or more officers of the nonprofit corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority.

(c)

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency to further the ordinary affairs of the nonprofit corporation:

(1)

Binds the corporation; and

(2)

Shall not be used to impose liability on a director, officer, employee, or agent.

(d)

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720